Washington statutes.
RCW 43.300.010

Department created—Transfer of powers, duties, and functions.

There is hereby created a department of state government to be known as the department of fish and wildlife. The department shall be vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law. All powers, duties, and functions of the department of fisheries and the department of wildlife are transferred to the department of fish and wildlife. All references in the Revised Code of Washington to the director or the department of fisheries or the director or department of wildlife shall be construed to mean the director or department of fish and wildlife.

[ 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 2.]